Massachusetts, session 194th, H4468.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 79G of chapter 233 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in lines 8 to 10, inclusive, the words 
“authorized agent of a hospital or health maintenance organization rendering such services or by 
the pharmacist or retailer of orthopedic appliances” and inserting in place thereof the following 
words:- pharmacist, retailer of orthopedic appliances or authorized agent of the physician, 
dentist, pharmacist, retailer of orthopedic appliances, hospital or health maintenance organization 
rendering such services. 
SECTION 2. Said section 79G of said chapter 233 is hereby further amended by striking 
out, in lines 27 to 28, inclusive, the words “agent of such hospital or health maintenance 
organization and inserting in place thereof the following words:- authorized agent.